synthesisSoftware/libespeak-NG/dictsource/ar_rules
// *   Arabic Language ar ar_rules
// *   This file writen by Taha Zerrouki 2012
//*********
// *   This program is free software; you can redistribute it and/or modify  *
// *   it under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by  *
// *   the Free Software Foundation; either version 3 of the License, or     *
// *   (at your option) any later version.                                   *
// *                                                                         *
// *   This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,       *
// *   but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of        *
// *   MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the         *
// *   GNU General Public License for more details.                          *
// *                                                                         *
// *   You should have received a copy of the GNU General Public License     *
// *   along with this program; if not, see:                                 *
// *               <http://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.                           *
// ***************************************************************************/

// This file is UTF-8 encoded
// all words must be LOWER CASE  (although the initial letter will be automatically
//    converted if it's a 7bit ascii character)
// Text to phoneme rules for Arabic

// replace Arabic  eastern  character numbers with Arabic western character numbers
.replace
		٠	0
		۰	0
		۱	1
		١	1
		٢	2
		۲	2
		٣	3
		۳	3
		٤	4
		۴	4
		٥	5
		۵	5
		٦	6
		۶	6
		٧	7
		۷	7
		٨	8
		۸	8
		٩	9
		۹	9
		ئ	ء	//توحيد شكل الهمزة
		ؤ	ء
		إ	ءِ
		أ	ء
		ـ		//حذف التطويل

//all vowels
.A   ا ي و  َ ُ ِ ً ٌ ٍ ّ ى

//list of consonants
.C  ب پ ت ة ث ج ح خ د ذ ر ز  س ش ص ض ط  ظ ع غ ف ق ك ل م ن ئ ؤ ء أ آ إ ه

//all vowels
.L01   ا ي و   َ ُ ِ ً ٌ ٍ ّ ى

//short vowels (commonly unwritten )
.L02  َ ُ ِ  ً ٌ ٍ

//list of consonants
.L03   ب پ ت ة ث ج ح خ د ذ ر ز  س ش ص ض ط  ظ ع غ ف ق ك ل م ن ئ ؤ ء أ آ إ ه

// all Arabic characters without ا آ
.L04  ض ص ث ق ف غ ع ه خ ح ج  ً ٌ ٍ ، ؛ ش س ي ب ل ت ن م ك  َ ُ ِ ّ  ـ « » ظ ط ز ر ذ د ئ و ة ي  ؤ إ أ ء  پ گ

// all Arabic characters without short vowels and A
.L05  ض ص ث ق ف غ ع ه خ ح ج  ش س ي ب ل ت ن م ك  ظ ط ز ر ذ د ئ و ة ي  ؤ إ أ ء  پ گ

// group of digits
.L06 0 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9

// all Arabic characters
.L09  ض ص ث ق ف غ ع ه خ ح ج  ً ٌ ٍ ، ؛ ش س ي ب ل ا ت ن م ك  َ ُ ِ ّ  آ ـ « » ظ ط ز ر ذ د ئ و ة ي ژ ؤ إ أ ء ؟ پ گ


// Arabic Sun characters
.L10  ض ص ث ش س ل ت ن ظ ط ز ر ذ د

// Arabic Moon characters
.L11  ق ف غ ع ه خ ح ج ي ب م ك  و  إ أ ء


//.group



.group آ
        آ         ?aa

.group ا
       _) ا       a       // make the previous fatha long
		//ا       aa 
		L03)   ا   aa    // if a consonant is before it, make the fatha long
//	ا (_	aa
        ا (ُ       ?
        ا (ِ       ?
        ا (َ       ?
//        اً         '		//ألف بعده تنوين نصب

//        ا (ًS2               //a ألف بعده تنوين نصب
// السوابق قبل ال
	_ب) ا	(ل	i
	//_و) ا	(ل	a
	//_ف) ا	(ل	a
	//_ك) ا	(ل	a
   L03) ا (L03     aa
  _) ال (L10ّP2  ?a      //الشمس
    _) ال (L11P2  ?al       //القمر
   //     ات (_S2    aat       //جمع مؤنث سالم
//الحروف الشمسية
 // ال التعريف مع حرف شمسي
//25/05   
	_) ال (لP2    ?al
     _) ال (نP2    ?an
     _) ال (ثP2    ?aT
     _) ال (تP2    ?at
     _) ال (دP2    ?ad
	_) ال (رP2    ?ar
     _) ال (ذP2    ?aD
     _) ال (سP2    ?as
     _) ال (زP2    ?az
     _) ال (صP2    ?as[
    _) ال (شP2    ?aS
	  _)  ال (شّP2    ?a
     //_) ال (طP2    ?at[
     _) ال (ضP2    ?adH
     _) ال (ظP2    ?aZ


.group ب
        ب         b
		ب     (ّ   Bb
    // _) ب (P1      bi        //بشمس
	//_) ب (ال	bi //حرف الجر باء قبل ال التعريف
    _) بال (L10P3 bi        //بالشمس
     _) بال (L11P3 bil       //بالقمر
//الحروف الشمسية
 // ال التعريف مع حرف شمسي
  _)	بال	(لP3	bil
	_)	بال	(نP3	bin
	_)	بال	(ثP3	biT
	_)	بال	(تP3	bit
	_)	بال	(دP3	bid
	_)	بال	(رP3	bir
	_)	بال	(ذP3	biD
	_)	بال	(سP3	bis
	_)	بال	(زP3	biz
	_)	بال	(صP3	bis[
	_)	بال	(شP3	biS
	_)	بال	(طP3	bit[
	_)	بال	(ضP3	bidH
	_)	بال	(ظP3	biZ

.group پ
        پ          p

.group ت
        ت          t
		ت   (ّ   tt
		_)    ت  (َP1  t
     _) ت (P1      ta        //تسأل
	  _َ) ت (P2      t   
        ت (_S1     at        //سألت
		
.group ث
        ث          T
	
.group ج
        ج          dZ
		ج     (ّ    dZdZ

.group ح
        ح          H


.group خ
        خ          X

.group د
        د          d
		د     (ّ    dd

.group ذ
        ذ          D

.group ر
        ر          r

.group ز
        ز          z
		


.group س
        س          s
		س  (ّ    ss

.group ش
        ش          S
		ش   (ّ     SS


.group ص
        ص          s[
		ص    (ّ     s[s[


.group ض
        ض          dH
	//	ض      (ّ   dHdH

.group ط
        ط          t[


.group ظ
        ظ          Z

.group ع
        ع          A



.group غ
//        غ          R2
        غ          gH



.group ف
        ف          f
     _) فال (L10P3 fa        //فالشمس
	 _) فَالْ (L10P4 fa 
	 _) فَال (L10P4 fa 
     _) فال (L11P3 fal       //فالقمر
	 _) فَال (L11P4 fa
	 _) فَالْ (L11P4 fal
//الحروف الشمسية
 // ال التعريف مع حرف شمسي
     _) فال (لP3   fal
     _) فال (نP3   fan
     _) فال (ثP3   faT
     _) فال (تP3   fat
     _) فال (دP3   fad
     _) فال (رP3   far
     _) فال (ذP3   faD
     _) فال (سP3   fas
     _) فال (زP3   faz
     _) فال (صP3   fas[
     _) فال (شP3   faS
     _) فال (طP3   fat[
     _) فال (ضP3   fadH
     _) فال (ظP3   faZ


.group ق
        ق          q
		//ق   (ّ     qq


.group ك
        ك          k
		//ك     (ّ    kk
     _) كال (L10P3 ka        //كالشمس
	 _) كَالْ (L10P4 ka 
	 _) كَال (L10P4 ka 
     _) كال (L11P3 kal       //كالقمر
	 _) كَالْ (L11P4   kal
        ك (_S1     ka        // الضمير المتصل
        كم (_S2    kum       //الضمير المتصل
        كما (_S3   kumaa     //الضمير المتصل
        كن (_S2    kunna     //الضمير المتصل
//الحروف الشمسية
 // ال التعريف مع حرف شمسي
     _) كال (لP3   kal
    _) كال (نP3   kan
    _) كال (ثP3   kaT
    _) كال (تP3   kat
     _) كال (دP3   kad
     _) كال (رP3   kar
     _) كال (ذP3   kaD
     _) كال (سP3   kas
     _) كال (زP3   kaz
    _) كال (صP3   kas[
     _) كال (شP3   kaS
     _) كال (طP3   kat[
     _) كال (ضP3   kadH
     _) كال (ظP3   kaZ



.group گ
        گ          g


.group ل
	   ل          l
	ل    (ّ   ll
   _ا) ل (L10     '         // Sun letters
   _بِا) ل (L10     '         // Sun letters
   _وَا) ل (L10     '         // Sun letters
   _فَا) ل (L10     '         // Sun letters
   _كَا) ل (L10     '         // Sun letters
   _لِ) ل (L10     '         // Sun letters
  //   _) لل (L10P2  li        //للشمس
   //  _) لل (L11P2  lil       //للقمر

//الحروف الشمسية
 // ال التعريف مع حرف شمسي
 //    _) لل (لP2    lil
 //    _) لل (نP2    lin
 //    _) لل (ثP2    liT
 //    _) لل (تP2    lit
 //    _) لل (دP2    lid
 //    _) لل (رP2    lir
 //    _) لل (ذP2    liD
 //    _) لل (سP2    lis
 //    _) لل (زP2    liz
 //    _) لل (صP2    lis[
 //    _) لل (شP2    liS
 //    _) لل (طP2    lit[
 //    _) لل (ضP2    lidH
 //    _) لل (ظP2    liZ

.group م
        م          m
		


.group ن
        ن          n
        ن (ب       m
        ن (ْب      m

.group ه
        ه          h
        ه (_S1     h         // الضمير المتصل
        ها (_S2    haa       //الضمير المتصل
        هم (_S2    hum       //الضمير المتصل
        هما (_S3   humaa     //الضمير المتصل
        هن (_S2    hunna     //الضمير المتصل



.group و
     _) و          w         //واو في أول الكلمة
     ا) و          w         //واو بعد الألف
     ْ) و          w         // واو بعد سكون
     َ) و          w         //واو بعد فتحة
     ِ) و          w         //واو بعد كسرة
        و (L01     w         //واو بعدها حرف علة
   //  ُ) و          :         // make the prevuous damma long
   L03) و          uu        //واو بعد صامت دون تشكيل
     _) وال (L10P3 wa        //والشمس
	 _) وَالْ (L10P4 wa 
	 _) وَال (L10P4 wa 
     _) وال (L11P3 wal       //والقمر
  _) وَالْ (L11P4    wal
   _) وَال (L11P4   wal
        ون (_S2    uuna      //جمع مذكر سالم فلاحون
		وا (_S2    uu	     // فعل مع ضمائر الجمع المذكرة درسوا
		ُ)   وا (_S2    u
//الحروف الشمسية
 // ال التعريف مع حرف شمسي
     _) وال (لP3   wal
     _) وال (نP3   wan
     _) وال (ثP3   waT
     _) وال (تP3   wat
     _) وال (دP3   wad
     _) وال (رP3   war
     _) وال (ذP3   waD
     _) وال (سP3   was
     _) وال (زP3   waz
     _) وال (صP3   was[
     _) وال (شP3   waS
     _) وال (طP3   wat[
     _) وال (ضP3   wadH
     _) وال (ظP3   waZ



.group ي
     _) ي         j      ياء في أول الكلمة
     ا) ي         j         // ياء بعد ألف
     ْ) ي          j         //ياء بعد سكون
     َ) ي          j         // ياء بعد فتحة
     ُ) ي          j         //ياء بعد ضمّة
        ي (L01     j         //يا بعدها حروف علة
   //  ِ) ي          %:        // make the previous kasra long
   L03) ي          ii       // ياء بعد صامت دون تشكيل
        ية (_S2    ijjah     //يّة النسبة
        يون (_S3   ijjuun    //kجمع مذكر سالم منسوب جزائريون
        يين (_S3   ijjiin    //kجمع مذكر سالم منسوب جزائريين
        يات (_S3   ijjaat    //يّة النسبة في جمع المؤنث جزائريات
        ين (_S2    iina      //جمع مذكر سالم منصوب أو مجرور
        ي (_S1     ii        //ياء النسبة
		ِ)ي (_S1     i



.group ى 	//ألف مقصورة
      L03)  ى (_       aa
	  ى      a
   //   َ) ى          aa

.group ء
        ء          ?
		ء (ً ?an
.group ّ
       ّ        
	  // L03) ّ     %% //
	//b)  ّ    bb
.group ئ
        ئ          ?

.group ؤ
        ؤ          ?

.group ة
        ة          t
		ةً     tan  
//		ة  (L02        t         // التاء المربوطة مشكولة
//        ة (_S1     h         //التاء المربوطة غير مشكولة
//   L05) ة (_S1     ah        //بوطة ما قبلها صامت، يضاف إليه فتحة
//   L05) ة (L02      at        //تاء بعدها حركة وقبلها صامت
//   L02) ة (_S1     h         // التاء المربوطة غير مشكولة	وماقبلها مشكول
//        ة  (L02        t         // التاء المربوطة مشكولة
//        ة          t         // التاء المربوطة مشكولة
//vowels that are not usually written:


.group  ْ
        ْ 

.group َ
        َ          %a
		َ(ا	aa        // make the previous fatha long


.group ِ
        ِ          i
		ِ(ي	ii       // make the previous kassra long
     //   ِ (_S1     i         //    e


.group ُ
        ُ          u
		ُ(و	uu       // make the previous kassra long
     //   ُ (_S1     u         // o

.group ٌ // dammatan
        ٌ (_S1     un
        ٌ          '

.group    ً  // fatahatan
   
        ًا (S1     an
		

.group ٍ  // kasratan
        ٍ (_S1     in
        ٍ          '

.group أ
//        أ          ?

.group إ
        //إ  (ِ       ?i
		إ          ?i
	

.group ـ
        ـ          '

.group ،
،  ||

.group ؛
؛ 

//characters and numbers and words with English alphabet is translated by English phonemes


// default group for "non of the above"

.group

// non-ascii characters with specified pronunciations
// List the accented characters in en_list with the $accent attribute
